North Carolina, session 2025, SB314.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160D-202 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-202. Municipal extraterritorial jurisdiction.
…
(a1) Limitation on Authority. – Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, no city shall
exercise the powers granted to cities under this Chapter beyond its contiguous corporate limits
in a county that has adopted a zoning or unified development ordinance.
…
(c) County Approval of City Jurisdiction. – Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this
section, no city may extend its extraterritorial powers into any area for which the county has
adopted and is enforcing county zoning and subdivision regulations. However, the city may do
so where the county is not exercising both of these powers, or when the city and the county have
agreed upon the area within which each will exercise the powers conferred by this Chapter. No
city may extend its extraterritorial powers beyond one mile from its corporate limits without the
approval of the board or boards of county commissioners with jurisdiction over the area.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S314-v-1*